Florida, session 2026, HB239.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 125.5695, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
125.5695 Standards for storm water systems.—
(1) All storm water systems, including storm pipe and
storm structures in counties in this state, when installing new
storm pipe and storm structures, must follow the annual
Department of Transportation's Standard Specifications for Road
and Bridge Construction contained in the sections "Pipe
Culverts" and "Pipe Liner."
(2) Final inspections for all storm pipe and storm
structures in counties in this state must be performed by a
NASSCO's Pipeline Assessment Certification Program (PACP)
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb239-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 239 2026
certified technician who is employed by a third-party licensed
engineering firm that does not have a controlling interest in
the company that installed the storm system being inspected. The
inspection and video process may use standard closed-circuit
television inspection equipment, along with an optional camera
with a fisheye lens for video inspection purposes.
(3) The standards for installation and inspection in
subsections (1) and (2) supersede all existing and local
standards in counties.
Section 2. Section 166.04815, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
166.04815 Standards for storm water systems.—
(1) All storm water systems, including storm pipe and
storm structures in municipalities in this state, when
installing new storm pipe and storm structures, must follow the
annual Department of Transportation's Standard Specifications
for Road and Bridge Construction contained in the sections "Pipe
Culverts" and "Pipe Liner."
(2) Final inspections for all storm pipe and storm
structures in municipalities in this state must be performed by
a NASSCO's Pipeline Assessment Certification Program (PACP)
certified technician who is employed by a third-party licensed
engineering firm that does not have a controlling interest in
the company that installed the storm system being inspected. The
inspection and video process may use standard closed-circuit
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb239-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 239 2026
television inspection equipment, along with an optional camera
with a fisheye lens for video inspection purposes.
(3) The standards for installation and inspection in
subsections (1) and (2) supersede all existing and local
standards in municipalities.
Section 3. Pursuant to s. 18, Art. VII of the State
Constitution, the Legislature hereby determines and declares
that this act fulfills an important state interest.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb239-00